Missouri, session 2026, HB3515.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.371, to read as follows:
1.371. 1. As used in this section, the term "diesel-powered vehicle" means any of
the following, as defined in section 301.010, that is powered by a diesel-fueled engine:
(1) Automobile transporter;
(2) Boat transporter;
(3) Bus;
(4) Commercial motor vehicle;
(5) Farm tractor;
(6) Fleet vehicle;
(7) Local commercial motor vehicle;
(8) Local log truck;
(9) Local log truck tractor;
(10) Local transit bus;
(11) Log truck;
(12) Non-USA-std motor vehicle;
(13) Recreational motor vehicle;
(14) School bus;
(15) Shuttle bus;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3515 2
(16) Tractor, truck tractor, or truck-tractor;
(17) Truck;
(18) Truck-tractor semitrailer-semitrailer;
(19) Truck-trailer boat transporter combination; or
(20) Wrecker or tow truck.
2. No entity or person, including any public officer or employee of this state or
any political subdivision of this state, shall have the authority to enforce or attempt to
enforce any federal acts, laws, executive orders, administrative orders, court orders,
rules, regulations, statutes, or ordinances governing the removal of emission control
devices on any diesel-powered vehicle.
3. (1) Any entity that employs any person who acts knowingly, as defined in
section 562.016, to violate the provisions of subsection 2 of this section while acting
under the color of any state or federal law shall be liable to the injured party in an
action at law, suit in equity, or other proper proceeding for redress.
(2) In such actions, the court may award the prevailing party, other than the
state of Missouri or any political subdivision of the state, reasonable attorney's fees and
costs.
(3) Sovereign, official, or qualified immunity shall not be an affirmative defense
in such actions.
4. (1) Any entity that employs an individual acting as an official, agent,
employee, or deputy of the government of the United States, or otherwise acting under
the color of federal law within the borders of this state, shall be subject to a civil penalty
of one hundred thousand dollars per occurrence if such individual, acting knowingly, as
defined in section 562.016:
(a) Enforces or attempts to enforce any of the federal legislative, executive, or
judicial actions described in subsection 2 of this section; or
(b) Gives material aid and support to the efforts of another who enforces or
attempts to enforce any of the federal legislative, executive, or judicial actions described
in subsection 2 of this section.
(2) Any person residing or conducting business in a jurisdiction who believes
that an individual has taken action that would violate the provisions of this section shall
have standing to pursue an action for declaratory judgment in the circuit court of the
county in which the action allegedly occurred or in the circuit court of Cole County with
respect to the actions of such individual.
(3) If a court determines that an individual has taken any action in violation of
the provisions of this section, the entity that employs such individual shall be required to

HB 3515 3
pay the court costs and attorney's fees associated with the declaratory judgment action
that resulted in the civil penalty.
✔